src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-sieldw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - sieldõ: # adjectives 118 'eng /est selge/fin' - full paradigm
     sieldõ+A+Sg+Nom: sieldõ
     sieldõ+A+Sg+Gen: sieldõ
     sieldõ+A+Sg+Par: sieldõ
     sieldõ+A+Sg+Dat: sieldõn
     sieldõ+A+Sg+Ins: sieldõks
     sieldõ+A+Sg+Ill: [sieldõz, sieldõ]
     sieldõ+A+Sg+Ela: sieldõst
     sieldõ+A+Pl+Nom: sieldõd
     sieldõ+A+Pl+Gen: sieldõd
     sieldõ+A+Pl+Par: sieldidi
     sieldõ+A+Pl+Dat: sieldõdõn
     sieldõ+A+Pl+Ins: sieldõdõks
     sieldõ+A+Pl+Ill: sieldiž
     sieldõ+A+Pl+Ela: sieldist
